el: Τύπος κοπής νομίσματος: Λαμπρό ακυκλοφόρητο; Κανονικής κυκλοφορίας; Cameo; Deep cameo; Ματ δοκίμιο; Δοκίμιο; Αντίστροφο δοκίμιο; Δείγμα; Ακυκλοφόρητο; Άλλο
fr: Type de frappe de la pièce: Brillant universel; Frappe courante; Camée; Camée profond; Épreuve mate; Épreuve; Épreuve inversée; Spécimen; Non circulé; Autre
tr: Madeni para basım türü: Parlak çil; Tedavül baskısı; Cameo; Derin cameo; Mat proof; Proof; Ters proof; Örnek; Çil; Diğer
zh-CN: 硬币铸造版别: 未流通光面; 普制; 浮雕; 深浮雕; 哑光精制; 精制; 反向精制; 样币; 未流通; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de turnare a monedei: Necirculată (Brilliant Uncirculated); Emisiune de circulație (Business strike); Cameo; Deep Cameo; Mată Proof; Proof; Reverse Proof; Specimen; Necirculată; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de cunhagem: Flor de cunho brilhante; Cunhagem normal; Cameo; Deep cameo; Proof fosco; Proof; Proof reverso; Espécime; Não circulada; Outros
pl: Typ bicia monety: Menniczy (Brilliant uncirculated); Stempel zwykły (obiegowy); Cameo; Deep cameo; Stempel matowy (Matte proof); Stempel lustrzany (Proof); Stempel lustrzany odwrócony (Reverse proof); Stempel okazowy (Specimen); Menniczy (Uncirculated); Inny
sl-SI: Vrsta kovanja kovancev: Sijajno neobtočno; Navadno kovanje; Cameo; Deep cameo; Mat proof; Proof; Obrnjeni proof; Primerek; Neobtočno; Drugo
de: Art der Münzprägung: Stempelglanz (BU); Normalprägung; Cameo; Deep Cameo; Mattierte Polierte Platte; Polierte Platte (PP); Invertierte Polierte Platte; Spiegelglanz; Unzirkuliert; Andere
zh-TW: 硬幣鑄打類型: 亮面未流通; 流通幣; 浮雕精鑄 (Cameo); 深浮雕精鑄; 霧面精鑄; 精鑄; 逆向精鑄; 樣幣; 未流通; 其他
nb: Myntslagstype: Brilliant usirkulert; Sirkulasjonsmynt; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matt proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Prøvemynt; Usirkulert; Annet
da: Type af møntprægning: Brilliant ucirkuleret; Cirkulationsmønt; Cameo; Deep cameo; Mat proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Prøvemønt; Ucirkuleret; Andet
lt-LT: Monetos kaldinimo tipas: Briliantinė nebuvusi apyvartoje (BU); Įprasto kaldinimo (apyvartinė); „Cameo“; Gilioji „Cameo“; Matinė „Proof“; Kolekcinė („Proof“); Atvirkštinė „Proof“; Pavyzdinė („Specimen“); Nebuvusi apyvartoje; Kita
hu: Érmeverés típusa: Kiváló verdefényes; Forgalmi veret; Cameo; Mély cameo; Matt proof; Proof; Reverz proof; Minta; Verdefényes; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการผลิตเหรียญ: ไม่ผ่านการใช้งานแบบแวววาว; ผลิตเพื่อใช้งานจริง; คาเมโอ; ดีพคาเมโอ; ปรู๊ฟแบบด้าน; ปรู๊ฟ; ปรู๊ฟแบบกลับด้าน; เหรียญตัวอย่าง; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип щампа на монетата: Брилянтно нециркулирала; За обращение; Камея; Дълбока камея; Матов Proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Образец; Нециркулирала; Други
cs: Typ ražby mince: Ražební lesk; Běžná ražba; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matný proof; Proof; Obrácený proof (reverse proof); Vzorek (specimen); Neobíhající; Jiná
ja: コイン打刻タイプ: 完全未流通 (BU); ビジネスストライク; カメオ; ディープカメオ; マットプルーフ; プルーフ; リバースプルーフ; スペシメン; 未流通; その他
ru: Тип чеканки монеты: Brilliant Uncirculated; Обычный чекан; Камео (Cameo); Глубокое камео (Deep cameo); Матовый пруф; Пруф; Обратный пруф; Образец; Анциркулейтед (Uncirculated); Другое
sk-SK: Typ razby mince: Brilantná neobehová; Bežná razba; Cameo; Deep Cameo; Matná proof; Proof; Reverzná proof; Vzorový kus; Neobehová; Iné
vi: Kiểu dập tiền xu: Chưa lưu hành sáng bóng; Dập tiêu chuẩn; Cameo; Deep cameo; Proof mờ; Proof; Proof ngược; Bản mẫu; Chưa lưu hành; Khác
fi: Kolikon lyöntitapa: Brilliant uncirculated; Käyttöraha; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matta proof; Proof; Käänteinen proof; Näyteraha; Kiertämätön; Muu
sv: Myntslagstyp: Brilliant ocirkulerad; Cirkulationsmynt; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matt proof; Proof; Omvänd proof; Provmynt; Ocirkulerad; Övrigt
ko: 동전 주조 방식: 브릴리언트 미유통; 비즈니스 스트라이크; 카메오; 딥 카메오; 매트 프루프; 프루프; 리버스 프루프; 견본(Specimen); 미유통; 기타
es: Tipo de acuñación de la moneda: Sin circular brillante; Acuñación comercial; Camafeo; Camafeo profundo; Prueba mate; Prueba; Prueba inversa; Espécimen; Sin circular; Otro
it: tipo di conio della moneta: Fior di conio (BU); Conio standard; Cammeo; Cammeo profondo; Fondo specchio opaco; Fondo specchio (Proof); Proof inverso; Specimen; Non circolata; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de cunhagem: Não circulada brilhante; Cunhagem normal; Camafeu; Camafeu profundo; Prova mate; Prova; Prova reversa; Espécime; Não circulada; Outro
nl: Munt slagtype: Brilliant uncirculated; Business strike; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Specimen; Ongecirculeerd; Overig
en: Coin strike type: Brilliant uncirculated; Business strike; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Specimen; Uncirculated; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta udarca kovanice: Brilliant uncirculated; Standardni otkov; Cameo; Deep cameo; Matte proof; Proof; Obrnuti proof; Uzorak (specimen); Necirkulirano; Ostalo